src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON s56 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ geva
                     inf        ;
                     pres_ur    ;
          :%^AB3     prt_null_s ;
          :%^AB2     prt_u_p    ;
          :%^AB6     sup_ið_in  ;
                     imp_prsptc ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%^AB6%>in p26        ;

LEXICON s57 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ sita
                 inf        ;
                 pres_ur    ;
          :%^AB3 prt_null_s ;
          :%^AB2 prt_u_p    ;
                 sup_ið_in  ;
                 imp_prsptc ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>in  p26        ;

LEXICON s58 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ mala
                  inf             ;
                  pres_strong_s1  ;
          :%^IUML pres_strong_s23 ;
          :%^AB3  prt_null_s      ;
          :%^AB3  prt_u_p         ;
                  imp_prsptc      ;
                  sup_ið_in       ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>in   p26             ;

LEXICON s59 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ stjala
          :jal   inf             ;
          :jal   pres_strong_s1  ;
          :jel    pres_strong_s23 ;
          :jól   prt_null_s      ;
          :jól   prt_u_p         ;
          :jal   imp_prsptc      ;
          :ol    sup_ið_in       ;
          :jol   sup_ið_in       ;
          		 p26			 ;

LEXICON s60 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ taka, aka
                   inf             ;
                   pres_strong_s1  ;
          :%^IUML  pres_strong_s23 ;
          :%^AB3   prt_null_s      ;
          :%^AB3   prt_u_p         ;
                   imp_prsptc      ;
          :%^AB6   sup_ið_in       ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%^AB6in p26             ;

LEXICON s61 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ halda
          :hald   inf             ;
          :hald   pres_strong_s1  ;
          :held   pres_strong_s23 ;
          :helt   prt_null        ;
          :hild   prt_u_p         ;
          :hild   sup_ið_in       ;
          :halt   impsg			  ;
          :hald   imp_prsptc      ;
 		  :hildin p26             ;

LEXICON s62 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ sova
          :sov  inf             ;
          :sov  pres_strong_s1  ;
          :svev pres_strong_s23 ;
          :svav prt_null_s      ;
          :svóv prt_u_p         ;
          :sov  sup_ið_in       ;
          :sov  imp_prsptc      ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>in p26             ;

LEXICON s63 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ koma
                   inf             ;
                   pres_strong_s1  ;
          :%^eIUML pres_strong_s23 ;
                   prt_null_s      ;
                   prt_u_p         ;
                   sup_ið_in       ;
                   imp_prsptc      ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>in    p26             ;

LEXICON s64 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ lata
                   inf             ;
                   pres_strong_s1  ;
          :%^IUML  pres_strong_s23 ;
          :%^   prt_null_s      ;
          :%^AB2   prt_u_p         ;
                   sup_ið_in       ;
                   imp_prsptc      ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>in    p26             ;

LEXICON s64_1 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ láta
                   inf             ;
                   pres_strong_s1  ;
          :%^eIUML pres_strong_s23 ;
          :%^AB3   prt_null_s      ;
          :%^AB2   prt_u_p         ;
                   sup_ið_in       ;
                   imp_prsptc      ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>in    p26             ;

LEXICON s65 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ standa
 :and inf             ;
 :and pres_strong_s1  ;
 :end pres_strong_s23 ;
 :óð  prt_null_s      ;
 :óð  prt_u_p         ;
 :að  sup_ið_in       ;
 :and imp_prsptc      ;
 :att impsg           ;

LEXICON s66 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ biðja
                 jinf       ;
                 pres_ur_j2 ;
          :%^AB3 prt_null_s ;
          :%^AB2 prt_u_p    ;
				 imp		;
		  :j	 prsptc	 	;
                 sup_ið_in  ;
 		  :%>in  p26        ;

LEXICON s67 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ draga
          :ag       inf             ;
          :ag       pres_strong_s1  ;
          :eg       pres_strong_s23 ;
          :ó        prt_null_s      ; !dróg, should be dró
          :óg       prt_u_p         ;
          :ig       sup_ið_in       ; ! %^AB2
          :ag       imp_prsptc      ;
 		  :%>igin  	p26        		;

LEXICON s68 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ hvørva
          :vørv    inf        ;
          :vørv    pres_ur    ;
          :varv    prt_null_s ;
          :vurv    prt_u_p    ;
          :orv     sup_ið_in  ;
   +Use/NG:vorv    sup_ið_in  ;
          :vørv    imp_prsptc ;
		  :orv%>in p26        ;

LEXICON s69 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ sláa
          		inf                	;
          		pres_strong_s1     	;
  :%^IUML 		pres_strong_s23_t1 	;
  :%^AB2  		prt_null_s         	;
  :%^AB2%>g 	prt_u_p		  	   	;
  :%^eIUML%>r	prt_d				;
  				imp_prsptc			;
  :%^AB6%>g		sup_ið_in			;
  
! :slerdi prt_null_s         ;
! :slóg   prt_u_p            ;
! :slerd  prt_u_p            ;
! :sligi  sup_a              ;
! :sligin p26                ;

LEXICON s70 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ siga
           :sig    inf        ;
           :sig    pres_ur    ;
           :segði  prt_null   ;
           :søgd   prt_u_p    ;
           :sig    imp_prsptc ;
           :sag    sup        ;
  +V+PrfPrc:sagd%> p8         ;

LEXICON s71 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ skerja
            	jinf       		;
          :j  	pres_ir    		;
          :  	prt_d      		;
          	 	sup      		;
          :j  	imp_prsptc_j 	;
 		  :d 	p7         		;

LEXICON s72 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ eta
          :et     inf        ;
          :et     pres_ur    ;
          :át     prt_null_s ;
          :ót     prt_u_p    ;
          :et     sup_ið_in  ;
          :et     imp_prsptc ;
 		  :et%>in p26        ;

LEXICON s73 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ læa
          :læ   inf        			;
          :læ	pres_strong_s1 		;
          :læ   pres_strong_s23_t1  ;
          :læ   prt_ði 				;
          :ló	prt_null			;
          :læð	prt_u_p				;
          :læð  sup_ið_in      		;
          :læ   imp_prsptc 			;
		  :læin p26        			;
 

!! !!Ad hoc, irregular
! =================

LEXICON BLÍVA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:blíva    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:blívi    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:blív%>ur #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:blív%>ur #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:blíva    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:bleiv    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:bleivst  #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:bleiv    #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:blivu    #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:blív     #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:blívið   #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:blívandi VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:blivin   #  ;
         +V+Sup:blívið   #  ;

LEXICON EIGA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:eiga    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eigi    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eig%>ur #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:eig%>ur #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:eiga    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:átti    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:átti    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:átti    #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:áttu    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:eigandi VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:áttur   #  ;
         +V+Sup:átt     #  ;

LEXICON EITA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:eita    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eiti    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eit%>ur #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eit%>ur #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:eita    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:æt      #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:æt      #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:æt      #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:itu     #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:itandi  VANDI ; ! XXX check
      +V+PrfPrc:itin    #  ;
         +V+Sup:itið    #  ;

LEXICON GRÁTA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:áta    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:áti    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:æt%>ur #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:æt%>ur #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:áta    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:æt     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:æt     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:ætst   #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:æt     #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:ótu    #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:át     #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:átið   #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:átandi VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:átin   #  ;
         +V+Sup:átið   #  ;

LEXICON HAVA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:hava     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:havi     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:hev%>ur  #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:hev%>ur  #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:hava     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:hevði    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:hevði    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:hevði    #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:høvdu    #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:hav      #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:havið    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:havandi  VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:havd%>ur #  ;
         +V+Sup:havt     #  ;
