src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
eiga: EIGA ;
eita: EITA ;
gráta:gr GRÁTA ;
smágráta:smá#gr GRÁTA ;
hálvgráta:hálv#gr GRÁTA ;
stórgráta:stór#gr GRÁTA ;
skjálvtagráta:skjálvta#gr GRÁTA ;
hava: HAVA ;
blíva: BLÍVA ;
pástanda:pá#st s65 ;
behalda:be s61 ;
útlata:út#lat s64 ;
begrava:begrav s60 ;
halda: s61 ;
innihalda:inni s61 ;
uppihalda:uppi s61 ;
gøllhalda:gøll s61 ;
reinhalda:rein s61 ;
hátíðarhalda:hátíðar s61 ;
undirhalda:undir s61 ;
mishalda:mis s61 ;
minnishalda:minnis s61 ;
tvíhalda:tví s61 ;
veðhalda:veð s61 ;
neyðhalda:neyð s61 ;
standa:st s65 ;
undirstanda:undir#st s65 ;
forstanda:for#st s65 ;
útstanda:út#st s65 ;
draga:dr s67 ;
magadraga:maga#dr s67 ;
lagdraga:lag#dr s67 ;
tráðdraga:tráð#dr s67 ;
siga: s70 ;
fullsiga:full# s70 ;
endursiga:endur# s70 ;
missiga:mis# s70 ;
mótsiga:mót# s70 ;
avsiga:av# s70 ;
hálvsiga:hálv# s70 ;
ovsiga:ov# s70 ;
skerja:sker s71 ;
knúgvaskerja:knúgva#sker s71 ;
vongskerja:vong#sker s71 ;
lamskerja:lam#sker s71 ;
beinskerja:bein#sker s71 ;
sitja:sitj s57 ;
biðja:bið s66 ;
tilbiðja:tilbið s66 ;
bølbiðja:bølbið s66 ;
trábiðja:trábið s66 ;
taka:tak s60 ;
bandtaka:bandtak s60 ;
handtaka:handtak s60 ;
hundtaka:hundtak s60 ;
bergtaka:bergtak s60 ;
hugtaka:hugtak s60 ;
heltaka:heltak s60 ;
trølltaka:trølltak s60 ;
ognartaka:ognartak s60 ;
tjóðartaka:tjóðartak s60 ;
hertaka:hertak s60 ;
upptaka:upptak s60 ;
yvirtaka:yvirtak s60 ;
endurtaka:endurtak s60 ;
mistaka:mistak s60 ;
ljóstaka:ljóstak s60 ;
kjafttaka:kjafttak s60 ;
luttaka:luttak s60 ;
máttaka:máttak s60 ;
avtaka:avtak s60 ;
ovtaka:ovtak s60 ;
átaka:átak s60 ;
tvítaka:tvítak s60 ;
viðtaka:við#tak s60 ;
orðtaka:orðtak s60 ;
neyðtaka:neyðtak s60 ;
góðtaka:góðtak s60 ;
ljóðtaka:ljóðtak s60 ;
leka:lek s56 ;
reka:rek s56 ;
speireka:speirek s56 ;
naglreka:naglrek s56 ;
várreka:várrek s56 ;
spottreka:spottrek s56 ;
ala:al s58 ;
gala:gal s58 ;
stjala:st s59 ;
mergstjala:merg#st s59 ;
magnstjala:magn#st s59 ;
ørstjala:ør#st s59 ;
smástjala:smá#st s59 ;
mala:mal s58 ;
kringlumala:kringlumal s58 ;
koma:kom s63 ;
fullkoma:full#kom s63 ;
umkoma:um#kom s63 ;
forkoma:for#kom s63 ;
drepa:drep s56 ;
oyðidrepa:oyðidrep s56 ;
steindrepa:steindrep s56 ;
ørdrepa:ørdrep s56 ;
hálvdrepa:hálvdrep s56 ;
sjálvdrepa:sjálvdrep s56 ;
oyðdrepa:oyðdrep s56 ;
bráðdrepa:bráðdrep s56 ;
lesa:les s56 ;
tinglesa:tingles s56 ;
skáklesa:skákles s56 ;
lærlesa:lærles s56 ;
mislesa:misles s56 ;
ljóslesa:ljósles s56 ;
rættlesa:rættles s56 ;
trálesa:tráles s56 ;
lata:lat s64 ;
eta: s72 ;
kappeta:kapp s72 ;
stóreta:stór s72 ;
frosteta:frost s72 ;
oveta:ov s72 ;
oyðeta:oyð s72 ;
sita:sit s57 ;
umsita:umsit s57 ;
láta:lát s64_1 ;
fyriláta:fyri#lát s64_1 ;
forláta:for#lát s64_1 ;
avláta:av#lát s64_1 ;
grava:grav s60 ;
botngrava:botn#grav s60 ;
gosgrava:gos#grav s60 ;
undirgrava:undir#grav s60 ;
geva:gev s56 ;
grundgeva:grund#gev s56 ;
lóggeva:lóg#gev s56 ;
fyrigeva:fyri#gev s56 ;
tilgeva:til#gev s56 ;
útgeva:út#gev s56 ;
formgeva:form#gev s56 ;
navngeva:navn#gev s56 ;
yvirgeva:yvir#gev s56 ;
endurgeva:endur#gev s56 ;
sniðgeva:snið#gev s56 ;
sova: s62 ;
steinsova:stein s62 ;
forsova:for s62 ;
hálvsova:hálv s62 ;
ovsova:ov s62 ;
hvørva:h s68 ;
sjálvhvørva:sjálv#h s68 ;
bráðhvørva:bráð#h s68 ;
sláa:slá s69 ;
svímasláa:svíma#slá s69 ;
lamsláa:lam#slá s69 ;
kappsláa:kapp#slá s69 ;
kjaftsláa:kjaft#slá s69 ;
kantsláa:kant#slá s69 ;
jarðsláa:jarð#slá s69 ;
læa: s73 ;
tómlæa:tóm# s73 ;
smálæa:smá# s73 ;
stórlæa:stór# s73 ;
spottlæa:spott# s73 ;
hálvlæa:hálv# s73 ;
háðlæa:háð# s73 ;
aka:ak s60 ;
gita:git s57 ;
uppdraga:upp#dr s67 ;
